liblouis-back-translation-tables/en-us-g3-abk.ctb
# liblouis: English, U.S. Grade 3 table
#

#  copyright (C) 2019-2020 by IBus-Braille Development Team

include en-us-g2.ctb

# Dot 4 
sufword act 4-1
always better 4-12
always course 4-14
always doing 4-145
always etc 4-15
always first 4-124
always going 4-1245
always having 4-125
always if 4-24
always join 4-245
always kind 4-13
always life 4-123
always may 4-134
always next 4-1345
always old 4-135
always pre 4-1234
always quiet 4-12345
always represent 4-1235
always same 4-234
always true 4-2345
always up 4-136
always live 4-1236
always willing 4-2456
always except 4-1346
always yet 4-13456
always side 4-1356
always any 4-12346
always forget 4-123456
always offer 4-12356
always then 4-2346
always within 4-23456
always change 4-16
always they 4-126
always she 4-146
always than 4-1456
always who 4-156
always when 4-1246
always want 4-12456
always outside 4-1256
always own 4-246
always an 4-2
always beginning 4-23
always concern 4-25
always differ 4-256
always enter 4-26
always together 4-235
always giving 4-2356
always he 4-236
always inside 4-35
always writing 4-356
always strange 4-34
always origin 4-346
always number 4-3456
always might 4-345
always something 4-3
always coming 4-36

# Dot 5 
always import 5-24
always how 5-246
always condition 5-25
always during 5-256
always entire 5-26
always become 5-23
always make 5-23456
always towards 5-235
always give 5-2356
always house 5-236
always among 5-1
always bring 5-12
always went 5-12456
always why 5-1246
always ought 5-1256
always special 5-126
always foreign 5-123456
always anyone 5-12346
always often 5-12356
always love 5-1236
always short 5-146
always where 5-156
always know 5-13
always extra 5-1346
always ask 5-1356
always someone 5-3
always straight 5-34
always mind 5-345
always none 5-3456
always order 5-346
always instant 5-35
always write 5-356
always common 5-36
always jesus 5-245
always christ 5-14
always god 5-1245

always alone 5-2

# Removed word alone 5-﻿2 ( : )


# Dots 45 
always has 45-125
always idea 45-24
always judge 45-245
always however 45-246
always consider 45-25
always dear 45-256
always endeavour 45-26
always believe 45-23
always see 45-234
always treat 45-2345
always without 45-23456
always too 45-235
always great 45-2356
always hear 45-236
always appear 45-1
always another 45-2
always bear 45-12
always fear 45-124
always goes 45-1245
always week 45-12456
always whether 45-1246
always ounce 45-1256
always speak 45-126
always least 45-123
always please 45-1234
always quick 45-12345
always fortune 45-123456
always anybody 45-12346
always read 45-1235
always office 45-12356
always leave 45-1236
always most 45-134
always clear 45-14
always does 45-145
always those 45-1456
always share 45-146
always each 45-15
always chief 45-16
always keep 45-13
always near 45-1345
always year 45-13456
always extreme 45-1346
always other 45-135
always seem 45-1356
always thing 45-3
always strength 45-34
always mean 45-345
always nobody 45-3456
always ordinary 45-346
always instead 45-35
always writes 45-356
always comes 45-36

# Removed word another 45-﻿2 


# Dots 456
always improve 456-24
always judgement 456-245
always allow 456-246
always down 456-256
always enclose 456-26
always belong 456-23
always truely 456-2345
always made 456-23456
always two 456-235
always gave 456-2356
always her 456-236
always all 456-1
always brought 456-12
always follow 456-124
always gone 456-1245
always well 456-12456
always while 456-1246
always our 456-1256
always spoke 456-126
always long 456-123
always pro 456-1234
always quality 456-12345
always fortunate 456-123456
always anything 456-12346
always regular 456-1235
always official 456-12356
always left 456-1236
always did 456-145
always though 456-1456
always shalt 456-146
always even 456-15
always charge 456-16
always knew 456-13
always never 456-1345
always your 456-13456
always example 456-1346
always over 456-135
always soon 456-1356
always unto 456-136
always things 456-3
always strong 456-34
always my 456-345
always nothing 456-3456
always ordinarily 456-346
always interest 456-35
always written 456-356
always came 456-36
always continue 456-25
always along 456-2
always whole 456-156
always nothing 456-3456

# Special abbreviations
word is 2
word are 256
word me 345
midword rr 236
endword ss 46
sufword un 346


# Grade 3 Independent abbreviations
word everyday 15-5-145
word whatever 1246-5-15
word whatsoever 1246-234-135-5-15
word especially 15-126
word everywhere 15-5-156
word themselves 126-1236-234
word indeed 35-145
word inasmuch 35-1356-134-16
word justly 245-45
word likely 123-45
word likewise 123-2456-234-15
word necessarily 1345-15-14-45
word nevertheless 1345-5-15-234-234
word only 135-45
word possibly 1234-12-45
word probably 456-12-45
word peoples 1234-234
word qualities 456-12345-24-15-234
word rules 1235-123-1356
word sometimes 34-234
word surely 234-136-45
word somewhere 234-5-156
word throughout 5-1456-1256
word thus 1456-234
word unless 346-46
word wherever 156-1235


# Extra Dict
word notwithstanding 1345-346
word acknowledgement 1-14-13-56-2345
word acknowledgeable 1-14-13-1-3456
word what 1246
